Utah statutes.
58-63-201.   Board -- Duties.

(1)  There is created the Security Services Licensing Board consisting of:

(a)  two individuals who are officers or owners of a licensed contract security company;

(b)  one individual who is an officer or owner of a licensed armored car company;

(c)  one individual from among nominees of the Utah Sheriffs' Association;

(d)  one individual from among nominees of the Utah Chiefs of Police Association; and

(e)  two individuals representing the general public.

(2) (a)  The executive director shall appoint board members in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(b)  A board member serves in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3) (a)  The board shall carry out its duties and responsibilities in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.

(b)  The board shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:

(i)  assist the division in reviewing a complaint concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a person licensed under this chapter; and

(ii)  advise the division in its investigation of the complaint.

(4)  A board member who, under Subsection (3), has reviewed a complaint or advised in its investigation is disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding concerning the complaint.



Amended by Chapter 436, 2013 General Session

